Maryland, session 2025, HB1336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–214.4.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1336*

HOUSE BILL 1336
(a) The Commission, in coordination with [the Department,] the Department of
Human Services, [the Office of the Comptroller, the State Department of Education,] the
Health Education and Advocacy Unit, and the Maryland Hospital Association, shall
develop a process [that:] TO IMPLEMENT THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES SHALL:
(1) [Identifies] USE THE INFORMATION PROVIDED BY EACH HOSPITAL
UNDER SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION TO IDENTIFY the patients who [paid more
than $25 for hospital services who] may have qualified for free care under § 19–214.1 of
this subtitle AND COMAR 10.37.10.26, AS THOSE PROVISIONS WERE IN EFFECT 2017
THROUGH 2021, on the date the hospital service was provided during calendar years 2017
through 2021;
(2) [Provides reimbursement to the patients identified under item (1) of
this subsection, which may be applied incrementally;] NOTIFY THE PATIENTS
IDENTIFIED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION WHO MAY BE ELIGIBLE FOR A
REFUND; AND
(3) [Ensures] ENSURE that a patient’s alternate address is used if the
patient requested an alternate address for safety reasons[; and
(4) Determines how the Commission, the Department, the Department of
Human Services, the Office of the Comptroller, and the State Department of Education
should share with or disclose relevant information, including tax information, to the
minimum extent necessary, to the hospital and in accordance with federal and State
confidentiality laws for the purpose of carrying out the process developed under this
subsection].
(C) EACH ACUTE CARE HOSPITAL AND EACH CHRONIC CARE HOSPITAL IN
THE STATE UNDER THE JURISDICTION OF THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) DETERMINE THE ELIGIBILITY OF EACH PATIENT WHO CONTACTS
THE HOSPITAL FOR A REFUND UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(2) PROVIDE A REFUND TO EACH PATIENT WHO PAID MORE THAN $25
FOR HOSPITAL SERVICES AND WHO QUALIFIED FOR FREE CARE UNDER § 19–214.1
OF THIS SUBTITLE AND COMAR 10.37.10.26, AS THOSE PROVISIONS WERE IN
EFFECT 2017 THROUGH 2021, ON THE DATE THE HOSPITAL SERVICE WAS PROVIDED
DURING CALENDAR YEARS 2017 THROUGH 2021.
[(b)] (D) The Health Education Advocacy Unit in the Office of the Attorney
General shall assist patients identified under subsection [(a)] (B) of this section in
obtaining reimbursement under this section.

HOUSE BILL 1336 3
[(c)] (E) (1) The process developed under subsection (a) of this section[:
(i) Shall] SHALL require each hospital to [consider]:
[1. Tax data from the Office of the Comptroller as de facto
evidence of a patient’s income; and
2.] (I) [Data] CONSIDER THE NOTIFICATION SENT TO THE
PATIENT from [the Department,] the Department of Human Services[, and the State
Department of Education] UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION as de facto
evidence of a patient’s presumptive eligibility for free care; AND
(ii) [Shall require each hospital to provide] PROVIDE refunds to
patients who qualify under subsection [(g)(2)] (I)(2) of this section[; and
(iii) May not require a hospital to provide a patient with a refund if
the patient previously was denied free care because of a failed asset test for the identified
date of service].
(2) A HOSPITAL IS NOT REQUIRED TO PROVIDE A PATIENT WITH A
REFUND UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE PATIENT PREVIOUSLY WAS DENIED FREE
CARE BECAUSE OF A FAILED ASSET TEST FOR THE IDENTIFIED DATE OF SERVICE.
[(2)] (3) Each hospital shall create a webpage that includes:
(i) Information about the reimbursement provided in accordance
with this section, including the process to be followed by a patient and relevant timelines;
and
(ii) A telephone number and e–mail address that a patient may use
to submit questions about the reimbursement process developed under this section.
[(3)] (4) If a patient is entitled to a single refund per year under
subsection (a) of this section in an amount of $25 or less, the hospital may but is not
required to provide the reimbursement.
(5) EACH HOSPITAL, EITHER COLLECTIVELY OR INDEPENDENTLY,
SHALL CONDUCT A BROAD MARKETING CAMPAIGN TO INFORM PATIENTS OF:
(I) THE AVAILABILITY OF REFUNDS UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(II) HOW TO APPLY FOR A REFUND.

HOUSE BILL 1336
[(d)] (F) [(1)] The Commission may modify the process developed under
subsection (a) of this section as necessary.
[(2) If reimbursements are provided incrementally and less than 5% of the
estimated reimbursements are made each year during the first increment, the Commission
is not required to implement additional increments of the process.]
[(e)] (G) The [Department, the] Department of Human Services[, the Office of
the Comptroller, the State Department of Education,] and each hospital shall report
information on the process developed under this section to the Commission, in the time and
manner determined by the Commission.
[(f)] (H) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, [the Commission,
the Department, the Department of Human Services, the Office of the Comptroller, the
State Department of Education, and] each hospital shall disclose to:
(i) [Each other] THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES AND
THE COMMISSION, to the minimum extent necessary, relevant information[, including tax
information,] necessary for implementation of the process developed under subsection (a)
of this section, INCLUDING INFORMATION IDENTIFYING PATIENTS WHO PAID AN
OUT–OF–POCKET EXPENSE OF MORE THAN $25 FOR HOSPITAL SERVICES PROVIDED
DURING CALENDAR YEARS 2017 THROUGH 2021; and
(ii) The Health Education and Advocacy Unit relevant information
necessary for the Health Education and Advocacy Unit to assist patients in obtaining
reimbursement under subsection [(a)] (C) of this section, on receipt of the patient’s
executed authorization for release of medical information form provided by the Health
Education and Advocacy Unit or other authorization form required by the Department of
Human Services[, the Office of the Comptroller, or the State Department of Education].
(2) If the Health Education and Advocacy Unit requests information from
[the Commission, the Department,] the Department of Human Services[, the Office of the
Comptroller, the State Department of Education,] or a hospital to assist a patient in
obtaining reimbursement under subsection [(a)] (C) of this section, [the Commission, the
Department,] the Department of Human Services[, the Office of the Comptroller, the State
Department of Education,] or the hospital shall provide the information to the Health
Education and Advocacy Unit within 10 business days after the date of the receipt of the
request.
(3) This section may not be construed to make a hospital responsible for
the confidentiality of the information in possession of each State entity listed in paragraph
(1) of this subsection.
[(g)] (I) [(1) (i) On or before January 1, 2023, and October 1, 2024, the
Commission shall report to the Senate Finance Committee and the House Health and

HOUSE BILL 1336 5
Government Operations Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, on the development and implementation by hospitals of the process required under
subsection (a) of this section.
(ii) If the process developed under subsection (a) of this section
requires legislation for implementation, the Commission shall include the legislative
recommendations in the report required on or before January 1, 2023, under subparagraph
(i) of this paragraph.]
[(iii)] (1) [If the process established under subsection (a) of this
section does not require legislation, each] EACH hospital shall [implement]:
(I) IMPLEMENT the process developed under subsection (a) of this
section [on]; AND
(II) ON or before January 1, [2023] 2025, BEGIN RECEIVING
REQUESTS FOR REFUNDS, MAKING ELIGIBILITY DETERMINATIONS, AND ISSUING
REFUNDS TO ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER A REQUEST FOR A
REFUND IS RECEIVED.
[(2) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, each hospital the
Commission, the Office of the Comptroller, the Department, the Department of Human
Services, and the State Department of Education shall implement Option 3 from the “Free
Hospital Care Refund Process” report submitted by the Commission in December 2022 as
required under paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection and in accordance with this section and
§ 13–203(c) of the Tax – General Article.
(ii) Under the process required under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph, a patient shall qualify for refunds who paid an out–of–pocket expense for
services based on the following:
1. The Office of the Comptroller determining that the
patient’s family income was at or below 200% of the federal poverty level during the year
of service date or dates; or
2. The Department of Human Services, the Department, or
the State Department of Education determining that during the year of service date or
dates, the patient:
A. Received benefits through the federal Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program;
B. Received benefits through the State’s Energy Assistance
Program;

HOUSE BILL 1336
C. Received benefits through the federal Special
Supplemental Food Program for Women, Infants, and Children; or
D. Lived in a household with children enrolled in the free and
reduced–cost meal program.]
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E)(2) OF THIS SECTION, A PATIENT
QUALIFIES FOR A REFUND UNDER THIS SECTION IF:
(I) THE PATIENT PAID AN OUT–OF–POCKET EXPENSE OF MORE
THAN $25 FOR HOSPITAL SERVICES PROVIDED DURING CALENDAR YEARS 2017
THROUGH 2021; AND
(II) THE PATIENT QUALIFIED FOR FREE CARE UNDER §
19–214.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND COMAR 10.37.10.26, AS THOSE PROVISIONS WERE
IN EFFECT 2017 THROUGH 2021, ON THE DATE THE HOSPITAL SERVICE WAS
PROVIDED.
[(3) The Office of the Comptroller, the Department of Human Services, the
Department, the State Department of Education, the Commission, and each hospital may
not implement the alternative approach included with Option 3 in the report identified
under paragraph (2)(i) of this subsection.]
[(h)] (J) (1) Each hospital shall reimburse the Commission, the Office of the
Comptroller, the Department, the Department of Human Services, the State Department
of Education, and the Health Education Advocacy Unit in the Office of the Attorney General
for the costs incurred by each State entity in complying with this section.
(2) (i) Reimbursement required under paragraph (1) of this subsection
shall be based on the hospital’s proportion of [the total number of patients who were
identified by the State entity as potentially eligible for reimbursement in a designated year]
INPATIENT ADMISSIONS, as determined by the Commission.
(ii) For the purpose of determining the reimbursement due under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the State entities identified under paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall provide quarterly cost information to the Commission.
(3) The Commission shall provide each hospital with the reimbursement
amount due to the appropriate State entity based on the costs incurred by the entity in
complying with this section ON A QUARTERLY BASIS.
(4) EACH HOSPITAL SHALL PAY THE REIMBURSEMENT AMOUNT DUE
TO THE APPROPRIATE STATE ENTITY NOT LATER THAN 60 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING
THE REIMBURSEMENT AMOUNT PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.

HOUSE BILL 1336 7
[(i)] (K) (1) (i) If a hospital fails to provide refunds to patients who
qualify under [subsection (g)(2) of this section as required] THIS SECTION OR FAILS TO
PAY THE REIMBURSEMENT TO ANY STATE ENTITY UNDER SUBSECTION (J)(4) OF
THIS SECTION, the Commission may impose a fine not exceeding $50,000 per violation.
(ii) In determining the amount of a fine to be imposed under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the Commission shall consider the appropriateness of
the fine in relation to the severity of the violation.
(2) A violation of this section by a hospital is:
(i) An unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practice, as defined under
Title 13 of the Commercial Law Article; and
(ii) Subject to enforcement and penalty provisions of Title 13 of the
Commercial Law Article.
Chapter 683 of the Acts of 2022
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2022. It shall remain effective for a period of [3] 6 years and, at the end of June 30,
[2025] 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.